Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.52, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. The owner of a motor vehicle subject to registration that who does not have a certificate of title or a junking certificate may dispose of the vehicle to a vehicle recycler licensed under chapter 321H for scrap or junk if the vehicle is twelve model years old or older and is acquired by the vehicle recycler for reasonable consideration equaling less than one thousand dollars. A licensed vehicle recycler shall not acquire such a vehicle unless the recycler uses the recyclerâs access to the state records system described in section 321.31 to verify there is not a lienholder who has a security interest in the vehicle. However, a licensed vehicle recycler is not required to verify the nonexistence of a lienholder if the Senate File 492, p. 2 recycler acquires the vehicle for scrap or junk from a scrap metal dealer, as defined in section 714.27. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 492, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor